Missouri, session 2026, HB2552.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 565, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 565.131, to read as follows:
565.131. 1. A person commits the offense of false imprisonment if he or she
knowingly restrains or impedes the movement of another unlawfully and without
consent so as to interfere substantially with the individual's liberty.
2. The offense of false imprisonment is a class A misdemeanor unless the
individual unlawfully restrained is removed from this state, in which case it is a class E
felony.
3. A person who commits the offense of false imprisonment shall also be guilty of
the offense of assault in the third degree under section 565.054 if physical contact was
initiated by such person during the commission of the offense of false imprisonment. If
the person moves to block an individual, it shall be assumed that any subsequent
physical contact was initiated by the person who is in violation of this section.
4. It shall be deemed that an individual has met the individual's burden of proof
in a false imprisonment case and assumed that the individual feared for his or her life if
the individual attempts to retreat and the person is behaving in an aggressive or
threatening manner and the person is not more than:
(1) Seven feet from the individual; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2552 2
(2) Seventy-five feet from the individual and the person is throwing objects
capable of bodily harm to the individual.
5. A person shall be guilty of a violation of this section and section 565.054 if the
person commits such offense upon a motor vehicle that is occupied so long as the action
against the motor vehicle constitutes a felony offense, and it shall be assumed the
occupants in the motor vehicle fear for their lives.
6. A person shall be guilty of a violation of this section and section 565.054 if the
person commits such offense upon a building that is occupied so long as the action
against the building constitutes a felony offense, and it shall be assumed the individuals
within the building fear for their lives.
7. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Interfere substantially", includes, but is not limited to, the willful blocking
of an individual's right-of-way;
(2) "Willful blocking", includes, but is not limited to, establishing a grip or hold,
moving to block, or participating as part of a group that blocks rights-of-way on
sidewalks, roadways, or any other location in which another has a right or obligation to
be or to proceed. An individual with the right-of-way has no obligation to escape or
retreat.
✔